District of Columbia statutes.
16-5104

District of Columbia government agency source lists.

Any agency or instrumentality of the District of Columbia government required to provide names and addresses of individuals to the Court pursuant to § 11-1905 for purposes of summoning individuals for jury service shall take all reasonable steps to ensure that the names and addresses are accurate, including:

(1)

Entering into a memorandum of understanding with the Court for the prompt sharing of complete and accurate information; and

(2)

The purging of inaccurate name and address information by the provider agency or instrumentality not less than once every calendar year.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-272, § 3(b), 54 DCR 856